Arkansas, session 2025, HB1242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2202(1)(B), concerning the definition
of "classified employee", is amended to read as follows:
(B) "Classified employee" does not include a nonlicensed:
(i) Nonlicensed teacher; or
(ii) School nurse; and

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 17, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-17-125. School nurses — Compensation.
(a) As used in this section, "school nurse" means a licensed nurse
engaging in school nursing activities.
(b) Each school district board of directors shall:
(1) Except as otherwise provided by this section, pay school
nurses a minimum base salary that is at least equal to the minimum base
salary required for classroom teachers by § 6-17-2403; and
(2) Adopt a school nurse salary schedule that incorporates the
same or similar factors and steps as those used to establish and incorporated
*TNL116*
02-24-2025 10:11:24 TNL116

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1242
in the public school district's employee salary schedule required by § 6-17-
2403.
(c)(1)(A) For the 2027-2028 school year and each school year
thereafter, each public school district shall have in place for a school
nurse employed by the public school district a minimum base salary and school
nurse salary schedule that meet the requirements of this section.
(B) The salary schedule for school nurses required under
this section shall be prorated based on a basic contract for teachers of one
hundred ninety (190) days as defined under § 6-17-2402.
(2)(A) A school nurse who holds a bachelor's degree and who has
zero (0) years of experience shall receive the same base salary for the
respective school year as that received by a classroom teacher who is
employed by the same public school district in which the school nurse is
employed and who has zero (0) years of experience and a bachelor's degree.
(B) A school nurse shall have his or her base salary
adjusted according to the factors considered in the salary schedule adopted
by the public school district in which the school nurse is employed.
(3) A school nurse shall receive at least ninety percent (90%)
of the base salary established for a classroom teacher with the same or
similar levels of education, experience, and other factors considered by a
public school district in its school nurse salary schedule and employee
salary schedule if the school nurse:
(A) Does not hold a bachelor's degree; and
(B) Is a registered nurse.
(4) A school nurse shall receive at least eighty percent (80%)
of the base salary established for a classroom teacher with the same or
similar levels of education, experience, and other factors considered by a
public school district in its school nurse salary schedule and employee
salary schedule if the school nurse:
(A) Does not hold a bachelor's degree; and
(B) Is a licensed practical nurse.
(d) A public school district shall not lower the current salary of a
school nurse who is currently:
(1) Employed by the public school district; and
(2) Earning a rate of pay that is higher than the salary
schedule required by this section.
02-24-2025 10:11:24 TNL116

As Engrossed: H2/24/25 HB1242

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b), concerning additional
education funding categories under the Public School Funding Act of 2003, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(7) The House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on
Education shall jointly consider costs associated with funding public school
district nurses under § 6-17-125 as part of the biennial adequacy review
process required under § 10-3-2102.

/s/J. Mayberry


























02-24-2025 10:11:24 TNL116